District of Columbia statutes.
6-1109.01

Violations.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person to alter, demolish, or construct any building or structure subject to the provisions of this subchapter or to subdivide any property subject to the provisions of this subchapter except in accordance with this subchapter or any rules, regulations, permits, or orders issued pursuant to this subchapter.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for any person acting under authority of or pursuant to a building permit or otherwise subject to this subchapter to fail to complete any alteration, repair, construction, or other work required as a condition of any order, permit approval, or enforcement action issued in accordance with this subchapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 10a
as added Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-185, § 2(n), 53 DCR 6712